Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 3. Zoning

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d Aviation §§ 83 to 99.

101A C.J.S. Zoning and Land Planning §§ 55, 122.

§ 10-5-301.
Power of counties, cities and towns.

The governing body of each incorporated Wyoming municipality and county may regulate and restrict by ordinance the number of stories and size of buildings and the height of other structures constructed upon land within one-half (1/2) mile of the boundaries of airports owned or controlled by the town, city or county. They may provide zoning for airspace beyond one-half (1/2) mile of the boundaries and within the county, to assure aircraft reasonable safety for visual and instrument approach and departure. The right to zone shall be confined to the geographical limits of the current applicable approach zone established by the federal aviation administration for the particular airport and in no case shall the right to zone extend beyond six (6) nautical miles along the approach path from the end of the instrument runway.

The powers herein granted to towns and cities shall apply to all municipal airports whether situated within or without the incorporated limits of a city or town.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 110, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 33-302; W.S. 1957, § 10-38; Laws 1971, ch. 146, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 10-4-106; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to municipal zoning, see §

15-1-601

et seq.

As to county planning and zoning, see chapter 5 of title 18.

Applied

in

Cheyenne Airport Bd. v. Rogers, 707 P.2d 717,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 579

(Wyo. 1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Zoning regulations limiting use of property near airport as taking of property, 18 ALR4th 542.

§ 10-5-302.
Manner of establishing regulations; appeals.

Zoning regulations shall be established by the municipal council and by the board of county commissioners in the manner provided by law and appeals may be taken accordingly.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 110, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 33-303; W.S. 1957, § 10-39; W.S. 1977, § 10-4-107; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.